California statutes. Education Code
(a) No later than June 30, 1990, the Office of the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges shall issue requests for proposal from community college districts for the establishment of an Associate of Arts, Teacher Assistant program. The requests for proposal shall describe the requirements set forth in subdivision (c), and shall be developed in consultation with representatives of the Superintendent of Public Instruction, the President of the University of California, the Chancellor of the California State University, the Chancellor of the California Community Colleges, the Executive Director of the California Postsecondary Education Commission, the Commission on Teacher Credentialing, the statewide Academic Senate for Community Colleges, and the President of the Association of Independent Colleges and Universities. That program shall include, but not necessarily be limited to, the two-year course of study described in Section 45350 and the awarding of an Associate of Arts, Teacher Assistant degree.

(b) The chancellor shall select two community college districts from separate geographic areas of this state for the purposes of this section, and shall allocate to each of those districts for the 1990–91 school year a planning grant of not less than twenty-five thousand dollars ($25,000).

(c) Each of the community college districts selected and funded under this section shall do all of the following:

(1) Implement the Associate of Arts, Teacher Assistant program in one or more community colleges, commencing with the 1991–92 school year.

(2) Ensure that each student enrolled in the program shall work under the direct supervision of a credentialed classroom teacher.

(3) Design the program to ensure that credit hours earned under the program at any community college are transferable to teacher preparation programs conducted at California State University campuses in the same region as that community college.

(4) No later than October 1, 1993, collect, and make available to the California Postsecondary Education Commission for purposes of the evaluation described in Section 45355, the following data for the 1991–92 and 1992–93 school years:

(A) The number of persons who enrolled in the program, and the number of persons who completed the program.

(B) Demographic information concerning those persons.

(C) The number and percentage of graduates of the program who pass the examination described in subdivision (c) of Section 45350.

(D) The number and percentage of graduates of the program who have obtained employment as teacher assistants, as reported pursuant to Section 45353.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1345, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

45352.

No later than June 30, 1991, the Commission on Teacher Credentialing shall adopt policies, procedures, and regulations as it deems necessary and appropriate for the administration of an examination pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 45350.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1345, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

45353.

Teacher assistants, as described in this article, shall not be deemed to be teachers for any purpose under this code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1345, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

45354.

The Commission on Teacher Credentialing shall levy a fee for the issuance and renewal of teacher assistant licenses. The fee for the issuance or renewal of the teacher assistant license shall be twenty-five dollars ($25). In subsequent years, the Commission on Teacher Credentialing may set a different fee, but in no case shall the fee exceed forty-five dollars ($45) without the express approval of the Legislature.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1345, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------

45355.

The Department of Finance shall determine the amount of the examination fee that would be sufficient to generate the revenues necessary to maintain and administer the examination described in Section 45350.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 840, Sec. 18.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

45356.

The State Department of Education shall, in the 1991–92 and 1992–93 school years, and thereafter as it may deem necessary, coordinate workshops between the community college districts that operate Associate of Arts, Teacher Assistant programs, the California State University, and elementary schools located within those community college districts, regarding changes in instructional methodology that may be necessary to ensure the effective use of teacher assistants.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1345, Sec. 2.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8. Teacher Aides [45360. - 45367.]

45360.

It is the intent and purpose of the Legislature that teacher aides be employed in the elementary schools of the state, specifically in grades one through six, to the end of assisting classroom teachers in carrying out activities directly related to the classroom instruction of pupils. From the moneys specially appropriated therefor by the Legislature, grants shall be made to school districts pursuant to the specifications of this article for teacher aide projects approved by the State Board of Education.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

45361.

The State Board of Education shall establish rules and regulations for the administration of this article which shall include, but not be limited to, the criteria upon which grants shall be made within the amounts appropriated by the Legislature and among the several districts of the state which may apply for such grants.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

45361.5.

(a) No person shall be initially assigned to assist in instruction for work as an aide for instructional purposes in kindergarten and grades 1 to 12, inclusive, unless the person has demonstrated proficiency in basic reading, writing, and mathematics skills pursuant to Section 45330.

(b) As used in this section, “initially assigned” means any assignment, including substitute, temporary, probationary, or permanent employment, to assist in instruction as an aide for instructional purposes.

(c) A school district may charge a fee to prospective aides taking the district proficiency test pursuant to the requirements of this section to fund the costs incurred by the district in giving the test. This fee may be subject to negotiation between the district and the exclusive representative of instructional aides, but in no event shall the fee exceed seven dollars ($7).

(d) The school district governing board, at a public meeting, may grant an exemption from this requirement to any person, for a period of one year, if the person is to be assigned as a bilingual-crosscultural aide and the governing board determines that there is no other person available to serve in the same capacity. Upon or prior to the expiration of the one-year period, the bilingual-crosscultural aide shall be required to take and pass the basic skills test required by this section. A bilingual-crosscultural aide who has not demonstrated his or her basic skills proficiency through these means may not be compensated for work as a bilingual-crosscultural aide. A bilingual-crosscultural aide may only be granted one exemption from this requirement. The authority of district governing boards to grant these exemptions shall cease on June 30, 1985.

(e) An aide who passes a district proficiency test as required by this section who transfers to another district and is employed in the same capacity, shall be considered to have met the proficiency standards for purposes of this section unless the district to which he or she has transferred determines that the test taken by the aide is not comparable to the standards required by the employing district.

(f) An aide who passes a district proficiency test, as required by this section, and who is reassigned to another school or program in the district and is employed in the same capacity, shall be considered to have met the state basic skills proficiency test requirement.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 1080, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

45362.

School districts shall establish standards and procedures for the implementation and conduct of teacher aide projects, authorized under the provisions of this article, which shall meet, but not be limited to, the provisions of Section 45361. Such standards and procedures shall be made a part of a school district grant application as described in this article.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

45363.

The State Board of Education shall direct that apportionment grants for teacher aide projects be made to school districts on the basis of two thousand dollars ($2,000) per school year per teacher aide employed, diminished by an amount derived by multiplying the ratio which the assessed valuation per unit of average daily attendance during the preceding fiscal year in grades kindergarten through eight in the district bears to the assessed valuation per unit of such average daily attendance in the state times one thousand dollars ($1,000).

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

45364.

All funds received by school districts under the provisions of this article shall be used for and restricted to the purpose of paying the salaries of teacher aides employed under the provisions of this article.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

45365.

Apportionments for the purpose of this article shall be made upon the order of the Superintendent of Public Instruction and by warrant of the State Controller. Funds apportioned shall be expended by school districts precisely in accordance with the rules and regulations established by the State Board of Education.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

45366.

Apportionments to a school district shall be in the form of grants, no part of which shall be required to be repaid to the state by the school district.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

45367.

Programs on projects conducted pursuant to this article shall be deemed a program of compensatory education, or an element thereof, and shall be coordinated with, and be an integral part of, the school district’s overall compensatory education plan. The programs and projects shall be subject to the provisions of Section 54461.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 8.5. Readers for Legally Blind Teachers [45370. - 45372.]

45370.

It is the intent of the Legislature in enacting this article that the governing board of each school district, each county superintendent of schools and each state special school or center employ qualified persons to serve as readers for the legally blind certified classroom teachers employed by each of these entities.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1288, Sec. 4.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

45371.

There is hereby created in the State Treasury the Reader Employment Fund, to be administered by the Superintendent of Public Instruction. From any funds that are appropriated to the Reader Employment Fund, the Superintendent of Public Instruction shall allocate to each applicant school district, county superintendent of schools, and state special school or center operated pursuant to Part 32 (commencing with Section 59000) an amount sufficient to provide the legally blind certificated classroom teachers employed by the applicant with the services of a reader for a maximum of 15 hours per school week.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1288, Sec. 5.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

45372.

The Superintendent of Public Instruction shall establish the procedures and necessary forms for applications for funding pursuant to this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1984, Ch. 648, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9. Retraining and Study [45380. - 45387.]

45380.

In enacting this article the Legislature recognizes that technological and other changes are occurring which may displace otherwise desirable classified employees in the public school systems of the state. The Legislature intends that the enactment of this article will encourage classified employees to prepare themselves for the changes that are occurring and will also encourage governing boards to utilize the article to further study and retraining by classified personnel.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

45381.

The governing board of any school district may grant any classified employee a leave of absence not to exceed one year for the purpose of permitting study by the employee or for the purpose of retraining the employee to meet changing conditions within the district.

The governing board may provide that such a leave of absence shall be taken in separate six-month periods or in any other appropriate periods, rather than for a continuous one-year period; provided, that the separate periods of leave of absence shall be commenced and completed within a three-year period. Any period of service by the individual intervening between the authorized separate periods shall comprise a part of the service required for a subsequent leave of absence for study or retraining purposes.

In school districts operating under the merit system, such leaves of absence shall be granted in accordance with rules established by the personnel commission.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

45382.

No leave of absence shall be granted under this article to any employee for study purposes who has not rendered service to the district for at least seven consecutive years, or for retraining purposes who has not rendered service to the district for at least three consecutive years preceding the granting of the leave, and no more than one such leave of absence shall be granted in each seven- or three-year period, respectively. The governing board, or personnel commission in merit system districts, may prescribe standards of service which shall entitle the employee to the leave of absence.

Any leave of absence granted under this article shall not be deemed a break in service for any purpose, except that such leave shall not be included as service in computing service for the granting of any subsequent leave under this article.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

45383.

Every employee granted a leave of absence pursuant to this article may be required to perform such services during the leave as the governing board of the district and the employee may agree upon in writing. The employee shall receive such compensation during the period of the leave as the governing board and the employee may agree upon in writing, which compensation shall be not less than the difference between the salary of the employee on leave and the salary of a substitute employee in the position which the employee held prior to the granting of the leave. However, in lieu of such difference, the board may pay one-half of the salary of the employee on leave or any additional amount up to and including the full salary of the employee on leave.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

45384.

Compensation granted by the governing board to the employee on leave may be paid in two equal annual installments during the first two years of service rendered in the employ of the governing board following the return of the employee from the leave of absence. The compensation shall be paid the employee while on the leave of absence in the same manner as if the employee were working for the district, upon the furnishing by the employee of a suitable bond indemnifying the governing board of the district against loss in the event that the employee fails to render at least two years’ service in the employ of the governing board following the return of the employee from the leave of absence. The bond shall be exonerated in the event the failure of the employee to return and render two years’ service is caused by the death or physical or mental disability of the employee. If the governing board finds, and by resolution declares, that the interests of the district will be protected by the written agreement of the employee to return to the service of the district and render at least two years’ service therein following his return from the leave, the governing board in its discretion may waive the furnishing of the bond and pay the employee on leave in the same manner as though a bond is furnished.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

45385.

Where one governing board serves as the governing board of two or more separate districts, an employee may fulfill the service requirements provided in Sections 45382 or 45384, or both, by service in any one or more of the districts under the jurisdiction of such governing board.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

45386.

This article shall apply to districts that have adopted the merit system in the same manner and effect as if it were a part of Article 6 (commencing with Section 45240) of this chapter or other applicable provisions of this code that may hereafter be enacted.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

45387.

(a) The governing board of a school district may grant reimbursement of the costs, including tuition fees, to a permanent classified employee who satisfactorily completes approved training to improve his or her job knowledge, ability, or skill. Programs eligible for that reimbursement shall include courses of study at approved academic institutions, seminars and training institutes conducted by recognized professional associations, and conferences, meetings and other training programs that are designed to upgrade the classified service and to encourage retraining of employees who may otherwise be subject to layoff as the result of technological changes. Eligibility for reimbursement shall be in accordance with rules established by the personnel commission in those districts that have adopted a merit system. This section does not apply to an employee who is receiving training and is eligible for reimbursement by another governmental agency, organization, or association.

(b) The governing board of a school district may permit a permanent classified employee to attend a minimum of one schoolday each year, during working hours, for job-related in-service training, with pay.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 547, Sec. 6.   Effective January 1, 2006.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 9.5. Professional Development for Classified School Employees [45390. - 45392.]

45390.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) Classified school employees play a vital role in the education of our pupils and students in our public schools and community colleges. They do the essential work that keeps our campuses safe, clean, and well maintained so that our pupils and students can get to school, focus on learning, and succeed at their highest levels.

(b) Because classified school employees are on the front lines working to ensure the safety and care of pupils and students on our campuses, they need professional development and training to update their skills and to learn the best practices for vital education programs,
 including campus safety, academic achievement and curriculum standards, special education, health care, child nutrition, pupil transportation, environmental safety, and parental involvement.

(c) Teachers and administrators serving pupils in kindergarten and grades 1 to 12, inclusive, play vital roles in supporting a pupil’s ability to achieve academically, and providing professional development training to teachers and administrators is essential to this goal.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 723, Sec. 1.   (SB 590)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------

45391.

(a) If a local educational agency expends funds for professional development for any schoolsite staff, the local educational agency shall consider the needs of its classified school employees.

(b) For purposes of this article, the following terms have the following meanings:

(1) “Classified school employee” means a person employed on a full-time or a part-time basis as a classified school employee at a community college, a public school, a charter school, or a county office of education.

(2) “Local educational agency” means a school district, a county office
 of education, a charter school, or a community college district.

(c) Professional development training for classified school employees to update their skills and to learn best practices may include, but is not limited to, any of the following:

(1) Pupil learning and achievement, including all of the following:

(A) Training for paraprofessionals to assist teachers and administrators to improve the academic achievement of pupils.

(B) Training to ensure the curriculum frameworks and instructional materials are aligned to the common core standards.

(C) Training in the management and use of state and
 local pupil data to improve pupil learning.

(D) Training on the best practices in the appropriate
 interventions and assistance for at-promise pupils.

(2) Pupil and campus safety, including training and staff development in the latest and best practices for pupil safety and campus safety.

(3) Education technology, including management strategies and best practices regarding the use of education technology to improve pupil performance.

(4) School facility maintenance and operations, including new research and best practices in the operation and maintenance of school facilities, such as green technology and energy efficiency, that help reduce the use and the cost of energy at schoolsites.

(5) Special education, including training and staff development on
 the best practices to meet the needs of special education pupils, and to comply with any new state and federal mandates.

(6) School transportation and bus safety, including training and staff development on the best practices and standards for pupil transportation.

(7) Parent involvement, including training and staff development to enhance the ability of a school to increase parent involvement at schoolsites.

(8) Food service, including training and staff development on new research and findings for food preparation to provide nutritional meals and food management.

(9) Health, counseling, and nursing services, including training and staff development on the
 latest and best practices for pupil health care and counseling needs.

(10) Environmental safety, including training and staff
 development on pesticides and other possibly toxic substances so that they may be safely used at schoolsites.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 800, Sec. 10.   (AB 413)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

45392.

Nothing in this article prohibits a local educational agency from providing professional development to teachers and administrators.

(History: Added by Stats. 2013, Ch. 723, Sec. 1.   (SB 590)   Effective January 1, 2014.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 10. Bilingual Office Employees [45400. - 45403.]

45400.

The Legislature hereby finds that when a public school that provides instruction in kindergarten or any of grades 1 through 12 has a substantial number of pupils who, together with their parents or guardians, speak a single primary language other than English, and does not have in its employ one or more bilingual employees fluent in both English and the primary language of such pupils and their parents or guardians, a serious educational disadvantage results for the pupils. Effective communication between the school authorities and both the affected pupils and their parents and guardians is absolutely essential to an effective educational program. It is, therefore, the intent of the Legislature in enacting this article to remove some of the barriers that face pupils who, together with their parents or guardians, speak a single primary language other than English, and to provide them, through more effective communication, with the most beneficial education possible from the public elementary schools, junior high schools, and high schools of this state.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

45401.

When at least 15 percent of the pupils enrolled in a public school that provides instruction in kindergarten or any of grades 1 through 12 speak a single primary language other than English, the governing board of the school district in which such school is located shall hire a bilingual person for the administrative office of each such school, as soon as a position is available as provided by Section 45403, to serve as a bilingual community liaison person or a paraprofessional, clerical, or other qualified employee of each such school, in accordance with the provisions of Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 45100) of this part, who is fluent in both English and in the primary language spoken by such pupils and their parents or guardians.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

45402.

The bilingual person employed pursuant to this article shall have as a principal function the communication with parents or guardians of such students in the primary language of the parents or guardians.

The governing board of the school district may make additional, reasonable assignments of duties for such bilingual employees.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------

45403.

This article shall not be construed as requiring school districts to replace existing classified personnel or to employ additional classified personnel. However, in any case in which additional classified positions are added to the administrative staff of a school which does not already employ a person as described in Section 45401, or if a vacancy is to be filled in a classified position in the administrative staff of such a school, the provisions of Section 45401 shall be adhered to in filling such position.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1976, Ch. 1010.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 11. Assumption by County Superintendent of Schools of the Operation of a School District’s Data Processing Center [45420. - 45423.]

45420.

The provisions of this article shall become applicable upon the execution of an agreement between a county superintendent of schools and a school district governing board providing for the assumption by the county superintendent of schools of a data processing center operated by the school district.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 746.)
-------------------------------------------

45421.

A school district employee in a position not requiring certification qualifications assigned to a data processing center which is transferred to a county superintendent of schools shall, upon the election of the employee to do so, cease to be an employee of the school district upon the effective date of the agreement transferring the data processing center to the county superintendent of schools and shall thereafter be an employee of the county superintendent of schools and be paid from the county school service fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 746.)
-------------------------------------------

45422.

District employees whose status is changed pursuant to this article shall retain all accumulated and unused sick leave, vacation, seniority rights and other rights and benefits which can reasonably be construed to have been an earned right at the time of transfer to the county school service fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 746.)
-------------------------------------------

45423.

No employee transferred from school district service pursuant to this article to a position, the salary of which is paid from the county school service fund, shall suffer any loss of salary at the time of transfer, or as to the future as it relates to his status on the salary scale of the county superintendent of schools in effect at that time.

(History: Added by Stats. 1977, Ch. 746.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 12. Particular Employees [45450. - 45451.]

45450.

The governing board of any school district may employ, in accordance with the provisions of this chapter, such personnel as may be necessary to act as guards at pedestrian crossings to ensure the safety of schoolchildren who use such intersections.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 295.)
-------------------------------------------

45451.

The governing board of any school district which employs school crossing guards pursuant to this article may be reimbursed from funds including, but not limited to, those collected pursuant to Sections 42200 and 42201 of the Vehicle Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 1978, Ch. 295.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 13. Classified School Employee Week [45460. - 45460.]

45460.

The third full week in May is designated as Classified School Employee Week.

All public schools shall annually observe that week in recognition of classified school employees and the contributions they make to the educational community. The observances required by this section shall be integrated into the regular school program.

This section shall apply to all schools under the jurisdiction of any school district or county board of education that has adopted the merit system in the same manner and effect as if it were a part of Article 6 (commencing with Section 45240), as well as to schools under the jurisdiction of any school district or county board of education that has not adopted the merit system.

(History: Added by Stats. 1986, Ch. 45, Sec. 1.   Effective April 2, 1986.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 14. Classified School Employee Summer Assistance Program [45500. - 45500.]

45500.

(a) The Classified School Employee Summer Assistance Program is hereby established.

(b) The program shall provide a participating classified employee up to one dollar ($1) for each one dollar ($1) that the classified employee has elected to have withheld from the classified employee’s monthly paychecks pursuant to this section.

(c) A local educational agency may elect to participate in the program. A participating local educational agency shall notify classified employees, by January 1 during a fiscal year in which moneys are appropriated for purposes of this section, that the local educational agency has elected to participate in the program for the next school year. Once a local educational
 agency elects to participate in the program and notifies classified employees pursuant to this subdivision, the local educational agency is prohibited from reversing its decision to participate in the program for the next school year beginning after the end of a fiscal year in which moneys are appropriated for purposes of this section.

(d) (1) A classified employee who elects to participate in the program shall notify the local educational agency, in writing, by March 1 during a fiscal year in which moneys are appropriated for purposes of this section, on a form developed by the department that the classified employee wishes to participate in the program for the applicable school year. The classified employee shall specify the amount to be withheld from their monthly paychecks during the applicable school year and whether they choose to have the amounts withheld paid out during the summer recess period in either one or two
 payments. A participating classified employee may elect to have up to 10 percent of the classified employee’s monthly pay withheld during the applicable school year.

(2) A classified employee is eligible to participate in the program if the classified employee has been employed with the local educational agency for at least one year at the time the classified employee elects to participate in the program.

(3) (A) A classified employee is eligible to participate in the program if the classified employee is employed by the local educational agency in the employee’s regular assignment for 11 months or fewer out of a 12-month period. For purposes of determining a classified employee’s total months employed by the local educational agency, the employing local educational agency shall exclude any hours worked by the classified employee outside of their regular
 assignment.

(B) For the 2020–21, 2021–22, and 2022–23 school years, for purposes of determining a classified employee’s total months employed by the local educational agency, the employing local educational agency shall exclude any hours worked by the classified employee as a result of an extension of the academic school year directly related to the COVID-19 pandemic, if the hours are in addition to the employee’s regular assignment and would prevent the employee from being eligible for this program.

(4) (A) A classified employee is not eligible to participate in the program if the classified employee’s regular annual pay received directly from the local educational agency is more than sixty-two thousand four hundred dollars ($62,400) for an entire school year at the time of enrollment. For purposes of determining a classified employee’s regular annual pay
 received directly from the local educational agency, the employing local educational agency shall exclude any pay received by the classified employee during the previous summer recess period.

(B) For purposes of this section, “summer recess period” means the period that regular class sessions are not being held by a local educational agency during the months of June, July, and August. Pay earned by a classified employee with limited employment during the months of June, July, or August that is not for the summer session shall not be excluded pursuant to this paragraph.

(e) A local educational agency that elects to participate in the program shall notify the department in writing, by April 1 during a fiscal year in which moneys are appropriated for purposes of this section, on a form developed by the department that it has elected to participate in the program. The local
 educational agency shall specify the number of classified employees that have elected to participate in the program and the total estimated amount to be withheld from participating classified employee paychecks for the applicable school year.

(f) The department shall notify participating local educational agencies in writing, by May 1 during a fiscal year in which moneys are appropriated for purposes of this section, of the estimated amount of state match funding that a participating classified employee can expect to receive as a result of participating in the program. If the funding provided for purposes of this section is insufficient to provide one dollar ($1) for each one dollar ($1) that has been withheld from participating classified employee monthly paychecks, the department shall notify local educational agencies of the expected prorated amount of state match funds that a participating classified employee can expect to receive as a
 result of participating in the program.

(g) Participating local educational agencies shall notify participating classified employees, by June 1 during a fiscal year in which moneys are appropriated for purposes of this section, the amount of estimated state match funds that a participating classified employee can expect to receive as a result of participating in the program. After receiving that notification, a classified employee may withdraw their election to participate in the program or reduce the amount to be withheld from their paycheck pursuant to paragraph (1) of subdivision (d) by notifying the employing local educational agency no later than 30 days after the start of school instruction for the applicable school year.

(h) The local educational agency shall deposit the amounts withheld from participating classified employee monthly paychecks in accordance with the choices
 made by each participating classified employee pursuant to subdivision (d) in a separate account.

(i) (1) A classified employee that separates from employment with a local educational agency during the applicable school year may request from the local educational agency any pay withheld from their paycheck pursuant to this section.

(2) A classified employee, due to economic or personal hardship, may request from the local educational agency any pay withheld from their paycheck pursuant to this section.

(3) A classified employee who requests any pay withheld by the local educational agency pursuant to paragraph (1) or (2) shall not be entitled to receive any state match funds provided pursuant to this section.

(j) Participating
 local educational agencies shall request payment from the department, on or before July 31 following the end of a school year during which the program was operative, on a form developed by the department, for the amount of classified employee pay withheld from the monthly paychecks of participating classified employees and placed in a separate account pursuant to subdivision (h).

(k) The department may use any unexpended balance of moneys appropriated in any prior fiscal year to the department for purposes of this section to provide up to one dollar ($1) for each one dollar ($1) that has been withheld from participating classified employee monthly paychecks.

(l) The department shall apportion funds to participating local educational agencies within 30 days of receiving a request for payment by the participating local educational agency pursuant to subdivision (j). The
 apportionment shall be determined for each local educational agency by the department on the basis of the amount that has been withheld from the monthly paychecks of participating classified employees and placed in a separate account pursuant to subdivision (h).

(m) If the total amount requested by participating local educational agencies exceeds the amount appropriated for purposes of this section, the department shall prorate the amount apportioned to participating local educational agencies accordingly, based on the amounts requested pursuant to subdivision (j).

(n) The participating local educational agency shall pay participating classified employees the amounts withheld in accordance with the classified employee’s choices, plus the amount apportioned by the department that is attributable to the amount withheld from that classified employee’s paychecks during the applicable
 school year. This amount shall be paid to the participating classified employee during the summer recess period, in either one or two payments, in accordance with the classified employee’s option pursuant to subdivision (d).
